Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1955.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 3A O.S. 2021, Section 200.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 200.1. A. As used in the Oklahoma Horse Racing Act:


1. “Advance deposit account wagering” means a form of pari-


mutuel system of wagering in which an individual has established an


account with an entity licensed by the Oklahoma Horse Racing


Commission;


2. “Advance deposit account wagering license” means a license


issued by the Oklahoma Horse Racing Commission to conduct advance


deposit account wagering and to accept deposits and wagers, issue a


receipt or other confirmation to the account holder evidencing such

Req. No. 2320 Page 1


deposits and wagers, and transfer credits and debits to and from


accounts;


3. “Commission” means the Oklahoma Horse Racing Commission;


2. 4. “Enclosure” means all buildings, structures, and grounds


utilized for the conduct of a race meeting and/or or gaming at the


race track and any additional areas designated by the Oklahoma Horse


Racing Commission;


3. 5. “Family” means husband, wife, and any dependent children;


4. 6. “Financial interest” means an interest that could result


in directly or indirectly receiving a pecuniary gain or sustaining a


pecuniary loss as a result of ownership or interest in a business


entity, or as a result of salary, gratuity, or other compensation or


remuneration from any person;


5. 7. “Horse racing” means any type of horse racing, including,


but not limited to, Arabian, Appaloosa, Paint, Pinto, Quarter Horse,


and Thoroughbred horse racing.


a. “Arabian horse racing” means the form of horse racing


in which each participating horse is an Arabian horse


registered with the Arabian Horse Club Registry of


America and approved by the Arabian Horse Racing


Association of America or any successor organization,


mounted by a jockey, and engaged in races on the flat


over a distance of not less than one-quarter (1/4)


mile or more than four (4) miles.

Req. No. 2320 Page 2


b. “Appaloosa horse racing” means the form of horse


racing in which each participating horse is an


Appaloosa horse registered with the Appaloosa Horse


Club or any successor organization and mounted by a


jockey.


c. “Quarter Horse racing” means the form of horse racing


where in which each participating horse is a Quarter


Horse registered with the American Quarter Horse


Association or any successor organization, mounted by


a jockey, and engaged in a race on the flat.


d. “Paint horse racing” means the form of horse racing in


which each participating horse is a Paint horse


registered with the American Paint Horse Association


or any successor organization and mounted by a jockey.


e. “Pinto horse racing” means the form of horse racing in


which each participating horse is a Pinto horse


registered with the Pinto Horse Association of


America, Inc. or any successor organization and


mounted by a jockey.


f. “Thoroughbred horse racing” means the form of horse


racing in which each participating horse is a


Thoroughbred horse registered with the Jockey Club or


any successor organization, mounted by a jockey, and


engaged in races on the flat.

Req. No. 2320 Page 3


“Horse racing” Horse racing shall not mean the racing of a cloned


horse or offspring of a cloned horse regardless of whether any breed


association has registered the horse;


6. 8. “Minor” means any individual under eighteen (18) years of


age;


7. 9. “Minus pool” means a pari-mutuel pool in which, after


deducting the take-out, not enough money remains in the pool to pay


the legally prescribed minimum return to those placing winning


wagers, and in which the organization licensee would be required to


pay the remaining amount due;


8. 10. “Occupation licensee” means any person who has obtained


an occupation license;


9. 11. “Organization licensee” means any person receiving an


organization license;


10. 12. “Pari-mutuel system of wagering” means a form of


wagering on the outcome of horse races in which those who wager


purchase wagers of various denominations on a horse or horses and


all wagers for each race are pooled and held by the organization


licensee for distribution. The pari-mutuel system of wagering uses


an electric totalizator or similar equipment which automatically


registers the wagers made on each horse;


11. 13. “Pari-mutuel pool” means the total money wagered by


individuals on any horse or horses in a particular horse race to


win, place, or show and held by the organization licensee pursuant

Req. No. 2320 Page 4


to the pari-mutuel system of wagering. There is a separate pari-


mutuel pool for win, for place, for show, and for each multiple


combination of betting approved by the Oklahoma Horse Racing


Commission;


12. 14. “Person” means any individual, partnership,


corporation, or other association or entity; and


13. 15. “Race meeting” means the entire period of time not to


exceed twenty (20) calendar days separating any race days for which


an organization license has been granted to a person by the


Commission to hold horse races at which the pari-mutuel system of


wagering is conducted, to hold non-pari-mutuel horse races or to


conduct accredited work or training races.


B. The Commission may define by rule or regulation any term


which is not defined in the Oklahoma Horse Racing Act.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 3A O.S. 2021, Section 204, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 204. A. The Oklahoma Horse Racing Commission shall:


1. Have supervision of:


a. all race meetings held in this state; provided, for


non-pari-mutuel race meetings and training races held


at non-pari-mutuel tracks, jurisdiction of the


Commission shall be limited to a period of time


beginning twelve (12) hours before the commencement of



Req. No. 2320 Page 5


the first race on a race day and ending four (4) hours


after the finish of the last race on a race day,


b. all occupation and organization licensees in this


state, and


c. all persons on the property of an organization


licensee; provided, for non-pari-mutuel race meetings


and training races held at non-pari-mutuel tracks,


supervision of such persons shall be limited to the


period set out in subparagraph a of this paragraph;


2. Have the authority to promulgate rules for the purpose of


administering the provisions of the Oklahoma Horse Racing Act;


3. Administer and enforce the provisions of the Oklahoma Horse


Racing Act and the rules of the Commission;


4. Adjudicate controversies arising from the enforcement of the


provisions of the Oklahoma Horse Racing Act and the rules of the


Commission;


5. Allocate racing days of not to exceed six (6) days per


calendar week, dates, and hours which that are in the best interests


of the people of this state to organization licensees;


6. Promulgate rules for the granting or refusing and the


suspension or revoking of licenses;


7. Promulgate rules for the holding, conducting, and operating


of all race meetings held in this state; provided, the rules of the


American Quarter Horse Association for regulation of the holding,

Req. No. 2320 Page 6


conducting, and operating of non-pari-mutuel race meetings and


training races held at non-pari-mutuel tracks shall serve as the


rules for the holding, conducting, and operating of non-pari-mutuel


race meetings and training races held at non-pari-mutuel tracks,


except that appeals from decisions of the stewards shall be to the


Commission, until such time as the Commission has promulgated


substantially similar rules for regulation of the holding,


conducting, and operating of non-pari-mutuel race meetings and


training races held at non-pari-mutuel tracks;


8. Promulgate rules to establish the terms and requirements for


obtaining and maintaining an advance deposit account wagering


license;


9. Have supervision and control of the pari-mutuel machines and


all other equipment at all race meetings held in this state;


9. 10. Check the making of pari-mutuel pools and the


distribution of such pools and shall:


a. contract with the Office of the State Auditor and


Inspector to conduct an annual audit and inspection of


live race meets in this state, and


b. reimburse the Office of the State Auditor and


Inspector for the cost of these services;


10. 11. Promulgate rules governing:


a. bids on leases,



Req. No. 2320 Page 7


b. the rate charged by an organization licensee for


admission to races, and


c. the rate charged for the performance of any service or


for the sale of any article on the premises of an


organization licensee;


11. 12. Approve all contracts and agreements for the payment of


money and all salaries, fees, and compensations by any organization


licensee;


12. 13. Have the authority to exclude, or compel the exclusion,


from any race meeting:


a. any person who violates the provisions of any rule or


order of the Commission or any law of this state, any


other state, or the United States,


b. any person who has been previously convicted of


violating any law of this state, any other state, the


United States, or


c. any other person, licensed or unlicensed, whose


conduct or reputation is such that his or her presence


at the race meeting may, in the opinion of the


Commission, reflect on the honesty and integrity of


horse racing or interfere with the orderly conduct of


the race meeting. No person shall be excluded or


ejected from a race meeting solely on the grounds of


race, color, creed, sex, national origin, or ancestry;

Req. No. 2320 Page 8


13. 14. Have investigatory powers and authority to place


attendants and such other persons as may be deemed necessary by the


Commission in the offices, on the tracks, or in places of business


of any organization licensee for the purpose of determining whether


an organization or occupation licensee is complying with the


provisions of the Oklahoma Horse Racing Act and the rules of the


Commission;


14. 15. Have authority to acquire or contract with, or


establish, maintain, and operate testing laboratories and related


facilities for the purpose of conducting:


a. human substance abuse testing on occupation licensees


who may affect the outcome of race results. Human


substance abuse tests and the laboratories performing


such tests must meet the nationally recognized


standards specified in the Mandatory Guidelines for


Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programs adopted by the


United States Department of Health and Human Services.


The Commission may require any occupation licensee to


submit to a human substance abuse test if the


Commission has probable cause to believe that such


licensee is possessing or using any controlled


dangerous substance or any other drug in violation of


any federal or state law. Provided, on and after July


1, 1994, such testing shall be in compliance with the

Req. No. 2320 Page 9


provisions of the Standards for Workplace Drug and


Alcohol Testing Act, and


b. a saliva test, a blood test, a urine test, or other


tests or combinations of tests on the horses run or to


be run in any race meeting. Prior to the Commission


entering into any contract pursuant to this paragraph,


the Attorney General shall review and approve the


contract. Any contract entered into pursuant to this


paragraph shall contain the specifications that were


in the request for bid for the contract;


15. 16. Approve of all proposed construction on property owned


or leased by an organization licensee;


16. 17. Have authority to require that all financial,


employment, or other records of an organization licensee shall be


kept in such manner as prescribed by the Commission and shall be


subject to inspection by the Commission. The organization licensee


shall submit to the Commission an annual balance sheet, profit-and-


loss statement, and any other information the Commission deems


necessary in order to administer the provisions of the Oklahoma


Horse Racing Act;


17. 18. Have the authority to suspend or revoke a license or


impose fines in amounts not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars


($10,000.00) against individuals for each violation and in amounts


not to exceed Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) against

Req. No. 2320 Page 10


organization licensees for each violation of any provision of the


Oklahoma Horse Racing Act, any rules adopted by the Commission, or


any order of the Commission, or for any other action which, in the


discretion of the Commission, is a detriment or impediment to horse


racing or both such suspension or revocation and fine. Each day


upon which such violation or other action by the organization


licensee occurs shall constitute a separate offense;


18. 19. Have authority to suspend a horse from participating in


races if the horse has been involved in any violation of the rules


promulgated by the Commission or the provisions of the Oklahoma


Horse Racing Act; and


19. 20. Prepare and electronically submit an annual report to


the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the


President Pro Tempore of the Senate. The report shall include an


account of the operations, actions, and orders of the Commission,


and an accounting of all revenue received by the Commission.


B. 1. The Commission may delegate to stewards or the Executive


Director of the Commission, those of its powers and duties as it


deems necessary to fully implement and effectuate the purposes of


the Oklahoma Horse Racing Act.


2. The Commission, upon appeal or due consideration, may


overrule any decision of a steward except decisions regarding


disqualifications for interference during the running of a race if a


preponderance of evidence indicates:

Req. No. 2320 Page 11


a. the stewards mistakenly interpreted the law,


b. new evidence of a convincing nature is produced, or


c. the best interests of racing and the state may be


better served.


3. Any decision pertaining to the finish of a race, as used for


purposes of pari-mutuel pool distribution to winning ticket holders,


may not be overruled. Any decision pertaining to the distribution


of purses may be changed only if a claim is made in writing to the


Commission by one of the involved owners or trainers, and a


preponderance of evidence clearly indicates to the Commission that


one or more of the grounds for protest, as provided for in the rules


prepared by the Commission, has been substantiated.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 205.9 of Title 3A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Any advanced deposit account wagering provider that accepts


funds from an Internet Protocol (IP) address within this state


pursuant to 15 U.S.C., Section 3001 et seq., shall obtain an advance


deposit account wagering license from the Oklahoma Horse Racing


Commission.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 3A O.S. 2021, Section 281, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 281. This section sets forth the provisions of the


Model Tribal Gaming Compact.

Req. No. 2320 Page 12


MODEL TRIBAL GAMING COMPACT


Between the [Name of Tribe]


and the STATE OF OKLAHOMA


This Compact is made and entered into by and between the [Name


of Tribe], a federally recognized Indian tribe (“tribe”), and the


State of Oklahoma (“state”), with respect to the operation of


covered games (as defined herein) on the tribe’s Indian lands as


defined by the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act, 25 U.S.C., Section


2703(4).


Part 1. TITLE


This document shall be referred to as the “[Name of Tribe] and


State of Oklahoma Gaming Compact”.


Part 2. RECITALS


1. The tribe is a federally recognized tribal government


possessing sovereign powers and rights of self-government.


2. The State of Oklahoma is a state of the United States of


America possessing the sovereign powers and rights of a state.


3. The state and the tribe maintain a government-to-government


relationship, and this Compact will help to foster mutual respect


and understanding among Indians and non-Indians.


4. The United States Supreme Court has long recognized the


right of an Indian tribe to regulate activity on lands within its


jurisdiction.



Req. No. 2320 Page 13


5. The tribe desires to offer the play of covered games, as


defined in paragraphs 5, 10, 11 and 12 of Part 3 of this Compact, as


a means of generating revenues for purposes authorized by the Indian


Gaming Regulatory Act, 25 U.S.C., Section 2701, et seq., including


without limitation the support of tribal governmental programs, such


as health care, housing, sewer and water projects, police,


corrections, fire, judicial services, highway and bridge


construction, general assistance for tribal elders, day care for the


children, economic development, educational opportunities and other


typical and valuable governmental services and programs for tribal


members.


6. The state recognizes that the positive effects of this


Compact will extend beyond the tribe’s lands to the tribe’s


neighbors and surrounding communities and will generally benefit all


of Oklahoma. These positive effects and benefits may include not


only those described in paragraph 5 of this Part, but also may


include increased tourism and related economic development


activities.


7. The tribe and the state jointly wish to protect their


citizens from any criminal involvement in the gaming operations


regulated under this Compact.


Part 3. DEFINITIONS


As used in this Compact:



Req. No. 2320 Page 14


1. “Adjusted gross revenues” means the total receipts received


from the play of all covered games minus all prize payouts;


2. “Annual oversight assessment” means the assessment described


in subsection B of Part 11 of this Compact;


3. “Central computer” means a computer to which player


terminals are linked to allow competition in electronic bonanza-


style bingo games;


4. “Compact” means this Model Tribal Gaming Compact between the


state and the tribe, entered into pursuant to Section 280 of this


title;


5. “Covered game” means the following games conducted in


accordance with the standards, as applicable, set forth in Sections


270 through 277 of this title: an electronic bonanza-style bingo


game, an electronic amusement game, an electronic instant bingo


game, nonhouse-banked card games; any other game, if the operation


of such game by a tribe would require a compact and if such game has


been: (i) approved by the Oklahoma Horse Racing Commission for use


by an organizational licensee, (ii) approved by state legislation


for use by any person or entity, or (iii) approved by amendment of


the State-Tribal Gaming Act; and upon election by the tribe by


written supplement to this Compact, any Class II game in use by the


tribe, provided that no exclusivity payments shall be required for


the operation of such Class II game;



Req. No. 2320 Page 15


6. “Covered game employee” means any individual employed by the


enterprise or a third party providing management services to the


enterprise, whose responsibilities include the rendering of services


with respect to the operation, maintenance or management of covered


games. The term “covered game employee” includes, but is not


limited to, the following: managers and assistant managers;


accounting personnel; surveillance and security personnel; cashiers,


supervisors, and floor personnel; cage personnel; and any other


person whose employment duties require or authorize access to areas


of the facility related to the conduct of covered games or the


maintenance or storage of covered game components. This shall not


include upper level tribal employees or tribe’s elected officials so


long as such individuals are not directly involved in the operation,


maintenance, or management of covered game components. The


enterprise may, at its discretion, include other persons employed at


or in connection with the enterprise within the definition of


covered game employee;


7. “Documents” means books, records, electronic, magnetic and


computer media documents and other writings and materials, copies


thereof, and information contained therein;


8. “Effective date” means the date on which the last of the


conditions set forth in subsection A of Part 15 of this Compact have


been met;



Req. No. 2320 Page 16


9. “Electronic accounting system” means an electronic system


that provides a secure means to receive, store and access data and


record critical functions and activities, as set forth in the State-


Tribal Gaming Act;


10. “Electronic amusement game” means a game that is played in


an electronic environment in which a player’s performance and


opportunity for success can be improved by skill that conforms to


the standards set forth in the State-Tribal Gaming Act;


11. “Electronic bonanza-style bingo game” means a game played


in an electronic environment in which some or all of the numbers or


symbols are drawn or electronically determined before the electronic


bingo cards for that game are sold that conforms to the standards


set forth in the State-Tribal Gaming Act;


12. “Electronic instant bingo game” means a game played in an


electronic environment in which a player wins if his or her


electronic instant bingo card contains a combination of numbers or


symbols that was designated in advance of the game as a winning


combination. There may be multiple winning combinations in each


game and multiple winning cards that conform to the standards set


forth in the State-Tribal Gaming Act;


13. “Enterprise” means the tribe or the tribal agency or


section of tribal management with direct responsibility for the


conduct of covered games, the tribal business enterprise that


conducts covered games, or a person, corporation or other entity

Req. No. 2320 Page 17


that has entered into a management contract with the tribe to


conduct covered games, in accordance with IGRA. The names,


addresses and identifying information of any covered game employees


shall be forwarded to the SCA at least annually. In any event, the


tribe shall have the ultimate responsibility for ensuring that the


tribe or enterprise fulfills the responsibilities under this


Compact. For purposes of enforcement, the tribe is deemed to have


made all promises for the enterprise;


14. “Facility” means any building of the tribe in which the


covered games authorized by this Compact are conducted by the


enterprise, located on Indian lands as defined by IGRA. The tribe


shall have the ultimate responsibility for ensuring that a facility


conforms to the Compact as required herein;


15. “Game play credits” means a method of representing value


obtained from the exchange of cash or cash equivalents, or earned as


a prize, in connection with electronic gaming. Game play credits


may be redeemed for cash or a cash equivalent;


16. “Player terminals” means electronic or electromechanical


terminals housed in cabinets with input devices and video screens or


electromechanical displays on which players play electronic bonanza-


style bingo games, electronic instant bingo games or electronic


amusement games;


17. “Independent testing laboratory” means a laboratory of


national reputation that is demonstrably competent and qualified to

Req. No. 2320 Page 18


scientifically test and evaluate devices for compliance with this


Compact and to otherwise perform the functions assigned to it in


this Compact. An independent testing laboratory shall not be owned


or controlled by the tribe, the enterprise, an organizational


licensee as defined in the State-Tribal Gaming Act, the state, or


any manufacturer, supplier or operator of gaming devices. The


selection of an independent testing laboratory for any purpose under


this Compact shall be made from a list of one or more laboratories


mutually agreed upon by the parties; provided that the parties


hereby agree that any laboratory upon which the National Indian


Gaming Commission (NIGC) has relied for such testing may be utilized


for testing required by this Compact;


18. “IGRA” means the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act, Pub. L. 100-


497, Oct. October 17, 1988, 102 Stat. 2467, codified at 25 U.S.C.,


Section 2701 et seq. and 18 U.S.C., Sections 1166 to 1168;


19. “Nonhouse-banked card games” means any card game in which


the tribe has no interest in the outcome of the game, including


games played in tournament formats and games in which the tribe


collects a fee from the player for participating, and all bets are


placed in a common pool or pot from which all player winnings,


prizes and direct costs are paid. As provided herein,


administrative fees may be charged by the tribe against any common


pool in an amount equal to any fee paid the state; provided that the



Req. No. 2320 Page 19


tribe may seed the pool as it determines necessary from time to


time;


20. “Patron” means any person who is on the premises of a


gaming facility, for the purpose of playing covered games authorized


by this Compact;


21. “Principal” means, with respect to any entity, its sole


proprietor or any partner, trustee, beneficiary or shareholder


holding five percent (5%) or more of its beneficial or controlling


ownership, either directly or indirectly, or any officer, director,


principal management employee, or key employee thereof;


22. “Rules and regulations” means the rules and regulations


promulgated by the Tribal Compliance Agency for implementation of


this Compact;


23. “Standards” means the descriptions and specifications of


electronic amusement games, electronic bonanza-style bingo games and


electronic instant bingo games or components thereof as set forth in


Sections 270 through 277 of this title as enacted in 2004 or as


amended pursuant to paragraph 27 of this Part or subsection D of


Part 13 of this Compact, including technical specifications for


component parts, requirements for cashless transaction systems,


software tools for security and audit purposes, and procedures for


operation of such games;


24. “State” means the State of Oklahoma;



Req. No. 2320 Page 20


25. “State Compliance Agency” (“SCA”) means the state agency


that has the authority to carry out the state’s oversight


responsibilities under this Compact, which shall be the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services or its successor agency. Nothing


herein shall supplant the role or duties of the Oklahoma State


Bureau of Investigation under state law. The Oklahoma Horse Racing


Commission and the Oklahoma Tax Commission shall have no role in


regulating or oversight of any gaming conducted by a tribe;


26. “Tribal Compliance Agency” (“TCA”) means the tribal


governmental agency that has the authority to carry out the tribe’s


regulatory and oversight responsibilities under this Compact.


Unless and until otherwise designated by the tribe, the TCA shall be


the [Name of Tribe] Gaming Commission. No covered game employee may


be a member or employee of the TCA. The tribe shall have the


ultimate responsibility for ensuring that the TCA fulfills its


responsibilities under this Compact. The members of the TCA shall


be subject to background investigations and licensed to the extent


required by any tribal or federal law, and in accordance with


subsection B of Part 7 of this Compact. The tribe shall ensure that


all TCA officers and agents are qualified for such position and


receive ongoing training to obtain and maintain skills that are


sufficient to carry out their responsibilities in accordance with


industry standards;



Req. No. 2320 Page 21


27. “State-Tribal Gaming Act” means the legislation in which


this Model Tribal Gaming Compact is set forth and, at the tribe’s


option, amendments or successor statutes thereto;


28. “Tribal law enforcement agency” means a police or security


force established and maintained by the tribe pursuant to the


tribe’s powers of self-government to carry out law enforcement


duties at or in connection with a facility; and


29. “Tribe” means the [Name of Nation].


Part 4. AUTHORIZATION OF COVERED GAMES


A. The tribe and state agree that the tribe is authorized to


operate covered games only in accordance with this Compact.


However, nothing in this Compact shall limit the tribe’s right to


operate any game that is Class II under IGRA and no Class II games


shall be subject to the exclusivity payments set forth in Part 11 of


this Compact. In the case of electronic bonanza-style bingo games,


there have been disagreements between tribes and federal regulators


as to whether or not such games are Class II. Without conceding


that such games are Class III, the tribe has agreed to compact with


the state to operate the specific type of electronic bonanza-style


bingo game described in this Compact to remove any legal uncertainty


as to the tribe’s right to lawfully operate the game. Should the


electronic bonanza-style bingo game or the electronic instant bingo


game described in this act be determined to be Class II by the NIGC


or a federal court, then the tribe shall have the option to operate

Req. No. 2320 Page 22


such games outside of this Compact; provided, any obligations


pursuant to subsection F of Part 11 of this Compact shall not be


affected thereby.


B. A tribe shall not operate an electronic bonanza-style bingo


game, an electronic instant bingo game or an electronic amusement


game pursuant to this Compact until such game has been certified by


an independent testing laboratory and the TCA as meeting the


standards set out in the State-Tribal Gaming Act for electronic


bonanza-style bingo games, electronic instant bingo games or


electronic amusement games, as applicable or any standards contained


in the Oklahoma Horse Racing Commission rules issued pursuant to


subsection B of Section 268 of this title that modify the standards


for such games that may be conducted by organizational licensees.


Provided, the tribe may rely on any certification of an electronic


bonanza-style bingo game, an electronic instant bingo, or electronic


amusement games by the Oklahoma Horse Racing Commission which was


obtained by an organization licensee pursuant to the State-Tribal


Gaming Act to establish certification compliance under this Compact.


The tribe may also rely on any certification of an electronic


bonanza-style bingo game, electronic instant bingo or an electronic


amusement game by the TCA obtained by another tribe which has


entered into the model compact to establish certification compliance


under this Compact.



Req. No. 2320 Page 23


Part 5. RULES AND REGULATIONS; MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS FOR


OPERATIONS


A. Regulations. At all times during the Term of this Compact,


the tribe shall be responsible for all duties which are assigned to


it, the enterprise, the facility, and the TCA under this Compact.


The tribe shall promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to


implement this Compact, which at a minimum shall expressly include


or incorporate by reference all provisions of this Part 5 and the


procedural requirements of Part 6 of this Compact. Nothing in this


Compact shall be construed to affect the tribe’s right to amend its


rules and regulations, provided that any such amendment shall be in


conformity with this Compact. The SCA may propose additional rules


and regulations related to implementation of this Compact to the TCA


at any time, and the TCA shall give good faith consideration to such


suggestions and shall notify the SCA of its response or action with


respect thereto.


B. Compliance; Internal Control Standards. All enterprises and


facilities shall comply with, and all covered games approved under


the procedures set forth in this Compact shall be operated in


accordance with the requirements set forth in this Compact,


including, but not limited to, those set forth in subsections C and


D of this Part. In addition, all enterprises and facilities shall


comply with tribal internal control standards that provide a level


of control that equals or exceeds those set forth in the National

Req. No. 2320 Page 24


Indian Gaming Commission’s Minimum Internal Control Standards (25


C.F.R., Part 542).


C. Records. In addition to other records required to be


maintained herein, the enterprise or tribe shall maintain the


following records related to implementation of this Compact in


permanent form and as written or entered, whether manually or by


computer, and which shall be maintained by the enterprise and made


available for inspection by the SCA for no less than three (3) years


from the date generated:


1. A log recording all surveillance activities in the


monitoring room of the facility, including, but not limited to,


surveillance records kept in the normal course of enterprise


operations and in accordance with industry standards; provided,


notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, surveillance


records may, at the discretion of the enterprise, be destroyed if no


incident has been reported within one (1) year following the date


such records were made. Records, as used in this Compact, shall


include video tapes and any other storage media;


2. Payout from the conduct of all covered games;


3. Maintenance logs for all covered games gaming equipment used


by the enterprise;


4. Security logs as kept in the normal course of conducting and


maintaining security at the facility, which at a minimum shall


conform to industry practices for such reports. The security logs

Req. No. 2320 Page 25


shall document any unusual or nonstandard activities, occurrences or


events at or related to the facility or in connection with the


enterprise. Each incident, without regard to materiality, shall be


assigned a sequential number for each such report. At a minimum,


the security logs shall consist of the following information, which


shall be recorded in a reasonable fashion noting:


a. the assigned number of the incident,


b. the date of the incident,


c. the time of the incident,


d. the location of the incident,


e. the nature of the incident,


f. the identity, including identification information, of


any persons involved in the incident and any known


witnesses to the incident, and


g. the tribal compliance officer making the report and


any other persons contributing to its preparation;


5. Books and records on all covered game activities of the


enterprise shall be maintained in accordance with generally accepted


accounting principles (GAAP); and


6. All documents generated in accordance with this Compact.


D. Use of Net Revenues. Net revenues that the tribe receives


from covered games are to be used for any one or more of those


purposes permitted under IGRA:


1. To fund tribal government operations or programs;

Req. No. 2320 Page 26


2. To provide for the general welfare of the tribe and its


members;


3. To promote tribal economic development;


4. To donate to charitable organizations; or


5. To help fund operations of local government agencies.


E. 1. The tribe’s rules and regulations shall require the


enterprise at a minimum to bar persons based on their prior conduct


at the facility or who, because of their criminal history or


association with criminal offenders, pose a threat to the integrity


of the conduct of covered games.


2. The TCA shall establish a list of the persons barred from


the facility.


3. The enterprise shall employ its best efforts to exclude


persons on such list from entry into its facility; provided, neither


persons who are barred but gain access to the facility, nor any


other person, shall have any claim against the state, the tribe or


the enterprise or any other person for failing to enforce such bar.


4. Patrons who believe they may be playing covered games on a


compulsive basis may request that their names be placed on the list.


All covered game employees shall receive training on identifying


players who have a problem with compulsive playing and shall be


instructed to ask them to leave. Signs and other materials shall be


readily available to direct such compulsive players to agencies


where they may receive counseling.

Req. No. 2320 Page 27


F. Audits. 1. Consistent with 25 C.F.R., Section 571.12,


Audit Standards, the TCA shall ensure that an annual independent


financial audit of the enterprise’s conduct of covered games subject


to this Compact is secured. The audit shall, at a minimum, examine


revenues and expenses in connection with the conduct of covered


games in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards and


shall include, but not be limited to, those matters necessary to


verify the determination of adjusted gross revenues and the basis of


the payments made to the state pursuant to Part 11 of this Compact.


2. The auditor selected by the TCA shall be a firm of known and


demonstrable experience, expertise and stature in conducting audits


of this kind and scope.


3. The audit shall be concluded within five (5) months


following the close of each calendar year, provided that extensions


may be requested by the tribe and shall not be refused by the state


where the circumstances justifying the extension request are beyond


the tribe’s control.


4. The audit of the conduct of covered games may be conducted


as part of or in conjunction with the audit of the enterprise, but


if so conducted shall be separately stated for the reporting


purposes required herein.


5. The audit shall conform to generally accepted auditing


standards. As part of the audit report, the auditor shall certify


to the TCA that, in the course of the audit, the auditor discovered

Req. No. 2320 Page 28


no matters within the scope of the audit which were determined or


believed to be in violation of any provision of this Compact.


6. The enterprise shall assume all costs in connection with the


audit.


7. The audit report for the conduct of covered games shall be


submitted to the SCA within thirty (30) days of completion. The


auditor’s work papers concerning covered games shall be made


available to the SCA upon request.


8. Representatives of the SCA may, upon request, meet with the


auditors to discuss the work papers, the audit or any matters in


connection therewith; provided, such discussions are limited to


covered games information and pursue legitimate state covered games


interests.


G. Rules for Play of and Prizes for Covered Games. Summaries


of the rules for playing covered games and winning prizes shall be


visibly displayed in the facility. Complete sets of rules shall be


available in pamphlet form in the facility.


H. Supervisory Line of Authority. The enterprise shall provide


the TCA and SCA with a chart of the supervisory lines of authority


with respect to those directly responsible for the conduct of


covered games, and shall promptly notify those agencies of any


material changes thereto.


I. Sale of Alcoholic Beverages. The sale and service of


alcoholic beverages in a facility shall be in compliance with state,

Req. No. 2320 Page 29


federal and tribal law in regard to the licensing and sale of such


beverages.


J. Age Restrictions. No person who would not be eligible to be


a patron of a pari-mutuel system of wagering pursuant to the


provisions of subsection B of Section 208.4 of this title shall be


admitted into any area in a facility where covered games are played,


nor be permitted to operate, or obtain a prize from or in connection


with the operation of, any covered game, directly or indirectly.


K. Destruction of Documents. Enterprise books, records and


other materials documenting the conduct of covered games shall be


destroyed only in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by


the TCA, which at a minimum shall provide as follows:


1. Material that might be utilized in connection with a


potential tort claim pursuant to Part 6 of this Compact, including,


but not limited to, incident reports, surveillance records,


statements, and the like, shall be maintained at least one (1) year


beyond the time which a claim can be made under Part 6 of this


Compact or, if a tort claim is made, beyond the final disposition of


such claim;


2. Material that might be utilized in connection with a prize


claim, including but not limited to incident reports, surveillance


records, statements, and the like, shall be maintained at least one


hundred eighty (180) days beyond the time which a claim can be made



Req. No. 2320 Page 30


under Part 6 of this Compact or, if a prize claim is made, beyond


the final disposition of such claim; and


3. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, all


enterprise books and records with respect to the conduct of covered


games or the operation of the enterprise, including, but not limited


to, all interim and final financial and audit reports and materials


related thereto which have been generated in the ordinary course of


business, shall be maintained for the minimum period of three (3)


years.


L. Location. The tribe may establish and operate enterprises


and facilities that operate covered games only on its Indian lands


as defined by IGRA. The tribe shall notify the SCA of the operation


of any new facility following the effective date of this Compact.


Nothing herein shall be construed as expanding or otherwise altering


the term “Indian lands”, as that term is defined in the IGRA, nor


shall anything herein be construed as altering the federal process


governing the tribal acquisition of “Indian lands” for gaming


purposes.


M. Records of Covered Games. The TCA shall keep a record of,


and shall report at least quarterly to the SCA, the number of


covered games in each facility, by the name or type of each and its


identifying number.


PART Part 6. TORT CLAIMS; PRIZE CLAIMS; LIMITED CONSENT TO SUIT



Req. No. 2320 Page 31


A. Tort Claims. The enterprise shall ensure that patrons of a


facility are afforded due process in seeking and receiving just and


reasonable compensation for a tort claim for personal injury or


property damage against the enterprise arising out of incidents


occurring at a facility, hereinafter “tort claim”, as follows:


1. During the term of this Compact, the enterprise shall


maintain public liability insurance for the express purposes of


covering and satisfying tort claims. The insurance shall have


liability limits of not less than Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars


($250,000.00) for any one person and Two Million Dollars


($2,000,000.00) for any one occurrence for personal injury, and One


Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) for any one occurrence for property


damage, hereinafter the “limit of liability”, or the corresponding


limits under the The Governmental Tort Claims Act, whichever is


greater. No tort claim shall be paid, or be the subject of any


award, in excess of the limit of liability;


2. The tribe consents to suit on a limited basis with respect


to tort claims subject to the limitations set forth in this


subsection and subsection C of this Part. No consents to suit with


respect to tort claims, or as to any other claims against the tribe


shall be deemed to have been made under this Compact, except as


provided in subsections B and C of this Part;


3. The enterprise’s insurance policy shall include an


endorsement providing that the insurer may not invoke tribal

Req. No. 2320 Page 32


sovereign immunity in connection with any claim made within the


limit of liability if the claim complies with the limited consent


provisions of subsection C of this Part. Copies of all such


insurance policies shall be forwarded to the SCA;


4. Any patron having a tort claim shall file a written tort


claim notice by delivery to the enterprise or the TCA. The date the


tort claim notice is filed with the enterprise or the TCA shall be


deemed the official date of filing the tort claim notice. The tort


claim notice shall be filed within one (1) year of the date of the


event which allegedly caused the claimed loss. Failure to file the


tort claim notice during such period of time shall forever bar such


tort claim; provided that a tort claim notice filed with the


enterprise or the TCA more than ninety (90) days, but within one (1)


year, after the event shall be deemed to be timely filed, but any


judgment thereon shall be reduced by ten percent (10%).;


5. If the tort claim notice is filed with the TCA, the TCA


shall forward a copy of the tort claim to the enterprise and the SCA


within forty-eight (48) hours of filing, and if the tort claim


notice is filed with the enterprise, the enterprise shall forward a


copy of the tort claim to the TCA and the SCA within forty-eight


(48) hours of filing;


6. The tort claim notice shall state the date, time, place and


circumstances of the incident upon which the tort claim is based,


the identity of any persons known to have information regarding the

Req. No. 2320 Page 33


incident, including employees or others involved in or who witnessed


the incident, the amount of compensation and the basis for said


relief; the name, address and telephone number of the claimant, and


the name, address and telephone number of any representative


authorized to act or settle the claim on behalf of the claimant;


7. All tort claim notices shall be signed by the claimant. The


rules and regulations may additionally require that the tort claim


notices be signed under oath. The rules and regulations may also


require that as a condition of prosecuting tort claims, the claimant


shall appear to be interviewed or deposed at least once under


reasonable circumstances, which shall include the attendance of the


claimant’s legal counsel if requested; provided that the enterprise


shall afford claimant at least thirty (30) days’ written notice of


the interview or deposition; and provided further that the


claimant’s failure to appear without cause for any interview or


deposition properly noticed pursuant to this paragraph shall be


deemed a voluntary withdrawal of the tort claim;


8. The enterprise shall promptly review, investigate, and make


a determination regarding the tort claim. Any portion of a tort


claim which is unresolved shall be deemed denied if the enterprise


fails to notify the claimant in writing of its approval within


ninety (90) days of the filing date, unless the parties by written


agreement extend the date by which a denial shall be deemed issued


if no other action is taken. Each extension shall be for no more

Req. No. 2320 Page 34


than ninety (90) days, but there shall be no limit on the number of


written agreements for extensions; provided, that no written


agreement for extension shall be valid unless signed by the claimant


and an authorized representative of the enterprise. The claimant


and the enterprise may continue attempts to settle a claim beyond an


extended date; provided, settlement negotiations shall not extend


the date of denial in the absence of a written agreement for


extension as required by this paragraph;


9. A judicial proceeding for any cause arising from a tort


claim may be maintained in accordance with and subject to the


limitations of subsection C of this Part only if the following


requirements have been met:


a. the claimant has followed all procedures required by


this Part, including, without limitation, the delivery


of a valid and timely written tort claim notice to the


enterprise,


b. the enterprise has denied the tort claim, and


c. the claimant has filed the judicial proceeding no


later than the one-hundred-eightieth day after denial


of the claim by the enterprise; provided, that neither


the claimant nor the enterprise may agree to extend


the time to commence a judicial proceeding; and


10. Notices explaining the procedure and time limitations with


respect to making a tort claim shall be prominently posted in the

Req. No. 2320 Page 35


facility. Such notices shall explain the method and places for


making a tort claim, that this procedure is the exclusive method of


making a tort claim, and that claims that do not follow these


procedures shall be forever barred. The enterprise shall make


pamphlets containing the requirements in this subsection readily


available to all patrons of the facility and shall provide such


pamphlets to a claimant within five (5) days of the filing of a


claim.


B. Prize Claims. The enterprise shall ensure that patrons of a


facility are afforded due process in seeking and receiving just and


reasonable compensation arising from a patron’s dispute, in


connection with his or her play of any covered game, the amount of


any prize which has been awarded, the failure to be awarded a prize,


or the right to receive a refund or other compensation, hereafter


hereinafter “prize claim”, as follows:


1. The tribe consents to suit on a limited basis with respect


to prize claims against the enterprise only as set forth in


subsection C of this Part; no consents to suit with respect to prize


claims, or as to any other claims against the tribe shall be deemed


to have been made under this Compact, except as provided in


subsections A and C of this Part;


2. The maximum amount of any prize claim shall be the amount of


the prize which the claimant establishes he or she was entitled to


be awarded, hereafter hereinafter “prize limit”;

Req. No. 2320 Page 36


3. Any patron having a prize claim shall file a written prize


claim notice by delivery to the enterprise or the TCA. The date the


prize claim is filed with the enterprise or the TCA shall be deemed


the official date of filing the prize claim notice. The prize claim


notice shall be filed within ten (10) days of the event which is the


basis of the claim. Failure to file the prize claim notice during


such period of time shall forever bar such prize claim;


4. If the prize claim notice is filed with the TCA, the TCA


shall forward a copy of the prize claim to the enterprise and the


SCA within forty-eight (48) hours of its filing; and if the prize


claim notice is filed with the enterprise, the enterprise shall


forward a copy of the tort claim to the TCA and the SCA within


forty-eight (48) hours of filing;


5. The written prize claim notice shall state the date, time,


place and circumstances of the incident upon which the prize claim


is based, the identity of any persons known to have information


regarding the incident, including employees or others involved in or


who witnessed the incident, the amount demanded and the basis for


said amount, the name, address and telephone number of the claimant,


and the name, address and telephone number of any representative


authorized to act or settle the claim on behalf of the claimant;


6. All notices of prize claims shall be signed by the claimant.


The rules and regulations may additionally require that the prize


claim notices be signed under oath;

Req. No. 2320 Page 37


7. The enterprise shall promptly review, investigate and make a


determination regarding the prize claim. Claimants shall cooperate


in providing information, including personal sworn statements and


agreeing to be interviewed, as the enterprise shall reasonably


request. The claimant is permitted to have counsel present during


any such interview;


8. If the prize claim is not resolved within seventy-two (72)


hours from the time of filing the claim in accordance with paragraph


of this subsection, the TCA shall immediately notify the SCA in


writing that the claim has not been resolved;


9. In the event the claim is resolved, the TCA shall not be


obligated to report that fact to the SCA, but shall make TCA reports


available for review;


10. Any portion of a prize claim which is unresolved shall be


deemed denied if the enterprise fails to notify the claimant in


writing of its approval within thirty (30) days of the filing date,


unless the parties agree by written agreement to extend the date.


Each extension shall be for no more than thirty (30) days, but there


shall be no limit on the number of written agreements for


extensions; provided, that no written agreements for extension shall


be valid unless signed by the claimant and an authorized


representative of the TCA. The claimant and the enterprise may


continue attempts to settle a claim beyond an extended date;


provided, settlement negotiations shall not extend the date of

Req. No. 2320 Page 38


denial in the absence of a written extension required by this


paragraph;


11. A judicial proceeding for any cause arising from a prize


claim may be maintained in accordance with and subject to the


limitations of subsection C of this Part only if the following


requirements have been met:


a. the claimant has followed all procedures required by


this Part, including without limitation, the delivery


of a valid and timely written prize claim notice to


the enterprise,


b. the enterprise has denied the prize claim, and


c. the claimant has filed the judicial proceeding no


later than one hundred eighty (180) days after denial


of the claim by the enterprise; provided that neither


the claimant nor the enterprise may extend the time to


commence a judicial proceeding; and


12. Notices explaining the procedure and time limitations with


respect to making a prize claim shall be prominently posted in the


facility. Such notices shall explain the method and places for


making claims, that this procedure is the exclusive method of making


a prize claim, and that claims that do not follow this procedure


shall be forever barred. The enterprise shall make pamphlets


containing the requirements in this subsection readily available to


all patrons of the facility and shall provide such pamphlets to a

Req. No. 2320 Page 39


claimant by the TCA within five (5) days of the filing date of a


claim.


C. Limited Consent to Suit for Tort Claims and Prize Claims.


The tribe consents to suit against the enterprise in a court of


competent jurisdiction with respect to a tort claim or prize claim


if all requirements of paragraph 9 of subsection A of this Part or


all requirements of paragraph 11 of subsection B of this Part have


been met; provided that such consent shall be subject to the


following additional conditions and limitations:


1. For tort claims, consent to suit is granted only to the


extent such claim or any award or judgment rendered thereon does not


exceed the limit of liability. Under no circumstances shall any


consent to suit be effective as to any award which exceeds such


applicable amounts. This consent shall only extend to the patron


actually claiming to have been injured. A tort claim shall not be


assignable. In the event any assignment of the tort claim is made


in violation of this Compact, or any person other than the patron


claiming the injury becomes a party to any action hereunder, this


consent shall be deemed revoked for all purposes. Notwithstanding


the foregoing, consent to suit shall not be revoked if an action on


a tort claim is filed by (i) a court appointed representative of a


claimant’s estate, (ii) an indispensable party, or (iii) a health


provider or other party subrogated to the claimant’s rights by


virtue of any insurance policy; provided, that nothing herein is

Req. No. 2320 Page 40


intended to, or shall constitute a consent to suit against the


enterprise as to such party except to the extent such party’s claim


is:


a. in lieu of and identical to the claim that would have


been made by the claimant directly but for the


appointment of said representative or indispensable


party, and participation of such other party is in


lieu of and not in addition to pursuit of the claim by


the patron, and


b. the claim of such other party would have been subject


to a consent to suit hereunder if it had been made by


the claimant directly; and


2. For prize claims, consent is granted only to the extent such


claim does not exceed the prize limit. Under no circumstances shall


any award exceed the prize limit. This consent shall only extend to


the patron actually claiming to have engaged in the play of a


covered game on which the claim is based. Prize claims shall not be


assignable. In the event any assignment of the prize claim is made,


or any person other than the claimant entitled to make the claim


becomes a party to any action hereunder, this consent shall be


deemed revoked for all purposes. Notwithstanding the foregoing,


consent to suit shall not be revoked if an action on a prize claim


is filed by (i) a court-appointed representative of a claimant’s


estate, or (ii) an indispensable party, provided that nothing herein

Req. No. 2320 Page 41


is intended to, or shall constitute a consent to suit against the


enterprise as to such party except to the extent such party’s claim


is:


a. in lieu of and identical to the claim that would have


been made by the claimant directly but for the


appointment of said representative or indispensable


party, and participation of such other party is in


lieu of and not in addition to pursuit of the claim by


the patron, and


b. the claim of such other party would have been subject


to a consent to suit hereunder if it had been made by


the claimant directly.


D. Remedies in the Event of No or Inadequate Insurance for Tort


Claim. In the event a tort claim is made and there is no, or


inadequate, insurance in effect as required under this Compact, the


enterprise shall be deemed to be in default hereunder unless, within


ten (10) days of a demand by the SCA or a claimant to do so, the


enterprise has posted in an irrevocable escrow account at a state or


federally chartered bank which is not owned or controlled by the


tribe, sufficient cash, a bond or other security sufficient to cover


any award that might be made within the limits set forth in


paragraph 1 of subsection A of this Part, and informs the claimant


and the state of:


1. The posting of the cash or bond;

Req. No. 2320 Page 42


2. The means by which the deposit can be independently verified


as to the amount and the fact that it is irrevocable until the


matter is finally resolved;


3. The right of the claimant to have this claim satisfied from


the deposit if the claimant is successful on the claim; and


4. The notice and hearing opportunities in accordance with the


tribe’s tort law, if any, otherwise in accordance with principles of


due process, which will be afforded to the claimant so that the


intent of this Compact to provide claimants with a meaningful


opportunity to seek a just remedy under fair conditions will be


fulfilled.


Part 7. ENFORCEMENT OF COMPACT PROVISIONS


A. The tribe and TCA shall be responsible for regulating


activities pursuant to this Compact. As part of its


responsibilities, the tribe shall require the enterprise do the


following:


1. Operate the conduct of covered games in compliance with this


Compact, including, but not limited to, the standards and the


tribe’s rules and regulations;


2. Take reasonable measures to assure the physical safety of


enterprise patrons and personnel, prevent illegal activity at the


facility, and protect any rights of patrons under the Indian Civil


Rights Act of 1968, 25 U.S.C., Sec. 1302-1303 Sections 1302 through


1303;

Req. No. 2320 Page 43


3. Promptly notify appropriate law enforcement authorities of


persons who may be involved in illegal acts in accordance with


applicable law;


4. Assure that the construction and maintenance of the facility


meets or exceeds federal and tribal standards for comparable


buildings; and


5. Prepare adequate emergency access plans to ensure the health


and safety of all covered game patrons. Upon the finalization of


emergency access plans, the TCA or enterprise shall forward copies


of such plans to the SCA.


B. All licenses for members and employees of the TCA shall be


issued according to the same standards and terms applicable to


facility employees. The TCA shall employ qualified compliance


officers under the authority of the TCA. The compliance officers


shall be independent of the enterprise, and shall be supervised and


accountable only to the TCA. A TCA compliance officer shall be


available to the facility during all hours of operation upon


reasonable notice, and shall have immediate access to any and all


areas of the facility for the purpose of ensuring compliance with


the provisions of this Compact. The TCA shall investigate any such


suspected or reported violation of this Compact and shall require


the enterprise to correct such violations. The TCA shall officially


enter into its files timely written reports of investigations and


any action taken thereon, and shall forward copies of such reports

Req. No. 2320 Page 44


to the SCA within fifteen (15) days of such filing. Any such


violations shall be reported immediately to the TCA, and the TCA


shall immediately forward the same to the SCA. In addition, the TCA


shall promptly report to the SCA any such violations which it


independently discovers.


C. In order to develop and foster a positive and effective


relationship in the enforcement of the provisions of this Compact,


representatives of the TCA and the SCA shall meet, not less than on


an annual basis, to review past practices and examine methods to


improve the regulatory scheme created by this Compact. The meetings


shall take place at a location mutually agreed to by the TCA and the


SCA. The SCA, prior to or during such meetings, shall disclose to


the TCA any concerns, suspected activities, or pending matters


reasonably believed to possibly constitute violations of this


Compact by any person, organization or entity, if such disclosure


will not compromise the interest sought to be protected.


Part 8. STATE MONITORING OF COMPACT


A. The SCA shall, pursuant to the provisions of this Compact,


have the authority to monitor the conduct of covered games to ensure


that the covered games are conducted in compliance with the


provisions of this Compact. In order to properly monitor the


conduct of covered games, agents of the SCA shall have reasonable


access to all areas of the facility related to the conduct of


covered games as provided herein:

Req. No. 2320 Page 45


1. Access to the facility by the SCA shall be during the


facility’s normal operating hours only; provided that to the extent


such inspections are limited to areas of the facility where the


public is normally permitted, SCA agents may inspect the facility


without giving prior notice to the enterprise;


2. Any suspected or claimed violations of this Compact or of


law shall be directed in writing to the TCA; SCA agents shall not


interfere with the functioning of the enterprise; and


3. Before SCA agents enter any nonpublic area of the facility,


they shall provide proper photographic identification to the TCA.


SCA agents shall be accompanied in nonpublic areas of the facility


by a TCA agent. A one-hour notice by SCA to the TCA may be required


to assure that a TCA officer is available to accompany SCA agents at


all times.


B. Subject to the provisions herein, agents of the SCA shall


have the right to review and copy documents of the enterprise


related to its conduct of covered games. The review and copying of


such documents shall be during normal business hours or hours


otherwise at tribe’s discretion. However, the SCA shall not be


permitted to copy those portions of any documents of the enterprise


related to its conduct of covered games that contain business or


marketing strategies or other proprietary and confidential


information of the enterprise, including, but not limited to,


customer lists, business plans, advertising programs, marketing

Req. No. 2320 Page 46


studies, and customer demographics or profiles. No documents of the


enterprise related to its conduct of covered games or copies thereof


shall be released to the public by the state under any


circumstances. All such documents shall be deemed confidential


documents owned by the tribe and shall not be subject to public


release by the state.


C. At the completion of any SCA inspection or investigation,


the SCA shall forward a written report thereof to the TCA. The TCA


shall be apprised on a timely basis of all pertinent,


nonconfidential information regarding any violation of federal,


state, or tribal laws, the rules or regulations, or this Compact.


Nothing herein prevents the SCA from contacting tribal or federal


law enforcement authorities for suspected criminal wrongdoing


involving the TCA. TCA may interview SCA inspectors upon reasonable


notice and examine work papers and SCA in the same fashion that SCA


inspectors may examine auditors’ notes and make auditor inquiry


unless providing such information to the TCA will compromise the


interests sought to be protected. If the SCA determines that


providing the information to the TCA will compromise the interests


sought to be protected, then the SCA shall provide such information


to the tribe in accordance with Part 13 14 of this Compact.


D. Nothing in this Compact shall be deemed to authorize the


state to regulate the tribe’s government, including the TCA, or to


interfere in any way with the tribe’s selection of its governmental

Req. No. 2320 Page 47


officers, including members of the TCA; provided, however, the SCA


and the tribe, upon request of the tribe, shall jointly employ, at


the tribe’s expense, an independent firm to perform on behalf of the


SCA the duties set forth in subsections A and B of this Part.


Part 9. JURISDICTION


This Compact shall not alter tribal, federal or state civil


adjudicatory or criminal jurisdiction.


Part 10. LICENSING


A. 1. Except as provided in paragraph 6 of Part 3 of this


Compact, no covered game employee shall be employed at a facility or


by an enterprise unless such person is licensed in accordance with


this Compact. In addition to the provisions of this Part which are


applicable to the licensing of all covered game employees, the


requirements of 25 C.F.R., Part 556, Background Investigations for


Primary Management Officials and Key Employees, and 25 C.F.R., Part


558, Gaming Licenses for Key Employees and Primary Management


Officials, apply to Key Employees and Primary Management Officials


of the facility and enterprise.


2. All prospective covered game employees shall apply to the


TCA for a license. Licenses shall be issued for periods of no more


than two (2) years, after which they may be renewed only following


review and update of the information upon which the license was


based; provided, the TCA may extend the period in which the license


is valid for a reasonable time pending the outcome of any

Req. No. 2320 Page 48


investigation being conducted in connection with the renewal of such


license. In the event the SCA contends that any such extension is


unreasonable, it may seek resolution of that issue pursuant to Part


12 of this Compact.


3. The application process shall require the TCA to obtain


sufficient information and identification from the applicant to


permit a background investigation to determine if a license should


be issued in accordance with this Part and the rules and


regulations. The TCA shall obtain information about a prospective


covered game employee that includes:


a. full name, including any aliases by which applicant


has ever been known,


b. social security number,


c. date and place of birth,


d. residential addresses for the past five (5) years,


e. employment history for the past five (5) years,


f. driver license number,


g. all licenses issued and disciplinary charges filed,


whether or not discipline was imposed, by any state or


tribal regulatory authority,


h. all criminal arrests and proceedings, except for minor


traffic offenses, to which the applicant has been a


party,


i. a set of fingerprints,

Req. No. 2320 Page 49


j. a current photograph,


k. military service history, and


l. any other information the TCA determines is necessary


to conduct a thorough background investigation.


4. Upon obtaining the required initial information from a


prospective covered game employee, the TCA shall forward a copy of


such information to the SCA, along with any determinations made with


respect to the issuance or denial of a temporary or permanent


license. The SCA may conduct its own background investigation of


the applicant at SCA expense, shall notify the TCA of such


investigation within a reasonable time from initiation of the


investigation, and shall provide a written report to the TCA of the


outcome of such investigation within a reasonable time from the


receipt of a request from the TCA for such information. SCA


inspector field notes and the SCA inspector shall be available upon


reasonable notice for TCA review and inquiry.


5. The TCA may issue a temporary license for a period not to


exceed ninety (90) days, and the enterprise may employ on a


probationary basis, any prospective covered game employee who


represents in writing that he or she meets the standards set forth


in this Part, provided the TCA or enterprise is not in possession of


information to the contrary. The temporary license shall expire at


the end of the ninety-day period or upon issuance or denial of a


permanent license, whichever event occurs first. Provided that the

Req. No. 2320 Page 50


temporary license period may be extended at the discretion of the


TCA so long as good faith efforts are being made by the applicant to


provide required information, or the TCA is continuing to conduct


its investigation or is waiting on information from others, and


provided further that in the course of such temporary or extended


temporary licensing period, no information has come to the attention


of the TCA which, in the absence of countervailing information then


in the record, would otherwise require denial of license. A


permanent license shall be issued or denied within a reasonable time


following the completion of the applicant’s background


investigation.


6. In covered gaming the tribe shall not employ and shall


terminate, and the TCA shall not license and shall revoke a license


previously issued to, any covered game employee who:


a. has been convicted of any felony or an offense related


to any covered games or other gaming activity,


b. has knowingly and willfully provided false material,


statements or information on his or her employment


application, or


c. is a person whose prior activities, criminal record,


or reputation, habits, and associations pose a threat


to the public interest or to the effective regulation


and control of the conduct of covered games, or create


or enhance the dangers of unsuitable, unfair, or

Req. No. 2320 Page 51


illegal practices, methods, and activities in the


conduct of covered games or the carrying on of the


business and financial arrangements incidental


thereto.


7. The SCA may object to the employment of any individual by


the enterprise based upon the criteria set forth in paragraph 6 of


this subsection A of this Part. Such objection shall be in writing


setting forth the basis of the objection. The SCA inspector’s work


papers, notes and exhibits which formed the SCA conclusion shall be


available upon reasonable notice for TCA review. The enterprise


shall have discretion to employ an individual over the objection of


the SCA.


8. The TCA shall have the discretion to initiate or continue a


background investigation of any licensee or license applicant and to


take appropriate action with respect to the issuance or continued


validity of any license at any time, including suspending or


revoking such license.


9. The TCA shall require all covered game employees to wear, in


plain view, identification cards issued by the TCA which include a


photograph of the employee, his or her first name, a four-digit


identification number unique to the license issued to the employee,


a tribal seal or signature verifying official issuance of the card,


and a date of expiration, which shall not extend beyond such


employee’s license expiration date.

Req. No. 2320 Page 52


B. 1. Any person or entity who, directly or indirectly,


provides or is likely to provide at least Twenty-five Thousand


Dollars ($25,000.00) in goods or services to the enterprise in any


twelve-month period, or who has received at least Twenty-five


Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for goods or services provided to the


enterprise in any consecutive twelve-month period within the


immediately preceding twenty-four-month period, or any person or


entity who provides through sale, lease, rental or otherwise covered


games, or parts, maintenance or service in connection therewith to


the tribe or the enterprise at any time and in any amount, shall be


licensed by the TCA prior to the provision thereof. Provided, that


attorneys or certified public accountants and their firms shall be


exempt from the licensing requirement herein to the extent that they


are providing services covered by their professional licenses.


2. Background investigations and licensing shall follow the


same process and apply the same criteria as for covered game


employees set forth in paragraph 6 of subsection A of this Part.


3. In the case of a license application of any entity, all


principals thereof shall be subjected to the same background


investigation required for the licensing of a covered game employee,


but no license as such need be issued; provided, no license shall be


issued to the entity if the TCA determines that one or more of its


principals will be persons who would not be qualified to receive a


license if they applied as covered game employees.

Req. No. 2320 Page 53


4. Nothing herein shall prohibit the TCA from processing and


issuing a license to a principal in his or her own name.


5. Licenses issued under this subsection shall be reviewed at


least every two (2) years for continuing compliance, and shall be


promptly revoked if the licensee is determined to be in violation of


the standards set forth in paragraph 6 of subsection A of this Part.


In connection with such a review, the TCA shall require the person


or entity to update all information provided in the previous


application.


6. The enterprise shall not enter into, or continue to make


payments pursuant to, any contract or agreement for the provision of


goods or services with any person or entity who does not meet the


requirements of this Part including, but not limited to, any person


or entity whose application to the TCA for a license has been


denied, or whose license has expired or been suspended or revoked.


7. Pursuant to 25 C.F.R., Part 533, all management contracts


must be approved by the Chair of the National Indian Gaming


Commission. The SCA shall be notified promptly after any such


approval.


8. In addition to any licensing criteria set forth above, if


any person or entity seeking licensing under this subsection is to


receive any fee or other payment based on the revenues or profits of


the enterprise, the TCA may take into account whether or not such



Req. No. 2320 Page 54


fee or other payment is fair in light of market conditions and


practices.


C. 1. Subject to the exceptions set forth in paragraph 4 of


this subsection, any person or entity extending financing, directly


or indirectly, to the facility or enterprise in excess of Fifty


Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) in any twelve-month period shall be


licensed prior to providing such financing. Principals thereof


shall be subjected to background investigations and determinations


in accordance with the procedures and standards set forth in


subsection A of this Part. Licenses issued under this section shall


be reviewed at least every two (2) years for continuing compliance,


and shall be promptly revoked if the licensee is determined to be in


violation of the standards set forth in paragraph 6 of subsection A


of this Part. In connection with such a review, the TCA shall


require the person or entity to update all information provided in


the previous application.


2. The SCA shall be notified of all financing and loan


transactions with respect to covered games or supplies in which the


amount exceeds Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) in any twelve-


month period, and shall be entitled to review copies of all


agreements and documents in connection therewith.


3. A supplier of goods or services who provides financing


exclusively in connection with the sale or lease of covered games


equipment or supplies shall be licensed solely in accordance with

Req. No. 2320 Page 55


licensing procedures applicable, if at all, to such suppliers


herein.


4. Financing provided by a federally regulated or state-


regulated bank, savings and loan, or trust, or other federally or


state-regulated lending institution; any agency of the federal,


state, tribal or local government; or any person or entity,


including, but not limited to, an institutional investor who, alone


or in conjunction with others, lends money through publicly or


commercially traded bonds or other commercially traded instruments,


including but not limited to the holders of such bonds or


instruments or their assignees or transferees, or which bonds or


commercially traded instruments are underwritten by any entity whose


shares are publicly traded or which underwriter, at the time of the


underwriting, has assets in excess of One Hundred Million Dollars


($100,000,000.00), shall be exempt from the licensing and background


investigation requirements in subsection B of this Part or this


subsection.


D. In the event the SCA objects to a lender, vendor or any


other person or entity within subsection B or C of this Part seeking


to do business with the enterprise, or to the continued holding of a


license by such person or entity, it may notify the TCA of its


objection. The notice shall set forth the basis of the objection


with sufficient particularity to enable the TCA to investigate the


basis of the objection. The SCA inspector and SCA inspector field

Req. No. 2320 Page 56


notes shall be available for TCA review and inquiry. Within a


reasonable time after such notification, the TCA shall report to the


SCA on the outcome of its investigation and of any action taken or


decision not to take action.


Part 11. EXCLUSIVITY AND FEES


A. The parties acknowledge and recognize that this Compact


provides tribes with substantial exclusivity and, consistent with


the goals of IGRA, special opportunities for tribal economic


opportunity through gaming within the external boundaries of


Oklahoma in respect to the covered games. In consideration thereof,


so long as the state does not change its laws after the effective


date of this Compact to permit the operation of any additional form


of gaming by any such organization licensee, or change its laws to


permit any additional electronic or machine gaming within Oklahoma,


the tribe agrees to pay the following fees:


1. The tribe covenants and agrees to pay to the state a fee


derived from covered game revenues calculated as set forth in


paragraph 2 of this subsection. Such fee shall be paid no later


than the twentieth day of the month for revenues received by the


tribe in the preceding month; and


2. The fee shall be:


a. four percent (4%) of the first Ten Million Dollars


($10,000,000.00) of adjusted gross revenues received


by a tribe in a calendar year from the play of

Req. No. 2320 Page 57


electronic amusement games, electronic bonanza-style


bingo games and electronic instant bingo games,


b. five percent (5%) of the next Ten Million Dollars


($10,000,000.00) of adjusted gross revenues received


by a tribe in a calendar year from the play of


electronic amusement games, electronic bonanza-style


bingo games and electronic instant bingo games,


c. six percent (6%) of all subsequent adjusted gross


revenues received by a tribe in a calendar year from


the play of electronic amusement games, electronic


bonanza-style bingo games and electronic instant bingo


games, and


d. ten percent (10%) of the monthly net win of the common


pool(s) or pot(s) from which prizes are paid for


nonhouse-banked card games. The tribe is entitled to


keep an amount equal to state payments from the common


pool(s) or pot(s) as part of its cost of operating the


games.


Payments of such fees shall be made to the Treasurer of the


State of Oklahoma. Nothing herein shall require the allocation of


such fees to particular state purposes, including, but not limited


to, the actual costs of performing the state’s regulatory


responsibilities hereunder.



Req. No. 2320 Page 58


B. Annual oversight assessment. In addition to the fee


provided for in subsection A of this Part, the state shall be


entitled to payment for its costs incurred in connection with the


oversight of covered games to the extent provided herein, “annual


oversight assessment”. The annual oversight assessment, which shall


be Thirty-five Thousand Dollars ($35,000.00), shall be determined


and paid in advance on a fiscal year basis for each twelve (12)


months ending on June 30 of each year.


C. Upon the effective date of this Compact, the tribe shall


deposit with the SCA the sum of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00)


(“start-up assessment”). The purpose of the start-up assessment


shall be to assist the state in initiating its administrative and


oversight responsibilities hereunder and shall be a one-time payment


to the state for such purposes.


D. Nothing in this Compact shall be deemed to authorize the


state to impose any tax, fee, charge or assessment upon the tribe or


enterprise except as expressly authorized pursuant to this Compact;


provided that, to the extent that the tribe is required under


federal law to report prizes awarded, the tribe agrees to copy such


reports to the SCA.


E. In consideration for the covenants and agreements contained


herein, the state agrees that it will not, during the term of this


Compact, permit the nontribal operation of any machines or devices


to play covered games or electronic or mechanical gaming devices

Req. No. 2320 Page 59


otherwise presently prohibited by law within the state in excess of


the number and outside of the designated locations authorized by the


State-Tribal Gaming Act. The state recognizes the importance of


this provision to the tribe and agrees, in the event of a breach of


this provision by the state, to require any nontribal entity which


operates any such devices or machines in excess of such number or


outside of the designated location to remit to the state at least


quarterly no less than fifty percent (50%) of any increase in the


entities’ adjusted gross revenues following the addition of such


excess machines. The state further agrees to remit at least


quarterly to eligible tribes, as liquidated damages, a sum equal to


fifty percent (50%) of any increase in the entities’ adjusted gross


revenues following the addition of such excess machines. For


purposes of this Part, “eligible tribes” means those tribes which


have entered into this Compact and are operating gaming pursuant to


this Compact within forty-five (45) miles of an entity which is


operating covered game machines in excess of the number authorized


by, or outside of the location designated by, the State-Tribal


Gaming Act. Such liquidated damages shall be allocated pro rata to


eligible tribes based on the number of covered game machines


operated by each Eligible Tribe in the time period when such


adjusted gross revenues were generated.


F. In consideration for the covenants and agreements contained


herein, the tribe agrees that in the event it has currently or

Req. No. 2320 Page 60


locates in the future a facility within a radius of twenty (20)


miles from a recipient licensee as that term is defined in


subsection K of Section 263 of this title that it shall comply with


the requirements of subsection K of Section 263 of this title.


Part 12. DISPUTE RESOLUTION


In the event that either party to this Compact believes that the


other party has failed to comply with any requirement of this


Compact, or in the event of any dispute hereunder, including, but


not limited to, a dispute over the proper interpretation of the


terms and conditions of this Compact, the following procedures may


be invoked:


1. The goal of the parties shall be to resolve all disputes


amicably and voluntarily whenever possible. A party asserting


noncompliance or seeking an interpretation of this Compact first


shall serve written notice on the other party. The notice shall


identify the specific Compact provision alleged to have been


violated or in dispute and shall specify in detail the asserting


party’s contention and any factual basis for the claim.


Representatives of the tribe and state shall meet within thirty (30)


days of receipt of notice in an effort to resolve the dispute;


2. Subject to the limitation set forth in paragraph 3 of this


Part, either party may refer a dispute arising under this Compact to


arbitration under the rules of the American Arbitration Association


(AAA), subject to enforcement or pursuant to review as provided by

Req. No. 2320 Page 61


paragraph 3 of this Part by a federal district court. The remedies


available through arbitration are limited to enforcement of the


provisions of this Compact. The parties consent to the jurisdiction


of such arbitration forum and court for such limited purposes and no


other, and each waives immunity with respect thereto. One


arbitrator shall be chosen by the parties from a list of qualified


arbitrators to be provided by the AAA. If the parties cannot agree


on an arbitrator, then the arbitrator shall be named by the AAA.


The expenses of arbitration shall be borne equally by the parties.


A party asserting noncompliance or seeking an interpretation of


this Compact under this section shall be deemed to have certified


that to the best of the party’s knowledge, information, and belief


formed after reasonable inquiry, the claim of noncompliance or the


request for interpretation of this Compact is warranted and made in


good faith and not for any improper purpose, such as to harass or to


cause unnecessary delay or the needless incurring of the cost of


resolving the dispute. If the dispute is found to have been


initiated in violation of this Part, the Arbitrator, upon request or


upon his or her own initiative, shall impose upon the violating


party an appropriate sanction, which may include an award to the


other party of its reasonable expenses incurred in having to


participate in the arbitration; and


3. Notwithstanding any provision of law, either party to the


Compact may bring an action against the other in a federal district

Req. No. 2320 Page 62


court for the de novo review of any arbitration award under


paragraph 2 of this Part. The decision of the court shall be


subject to appeal. Each of the parties hereto waives immunity and


consents to suit therein for such limited purposes, and agrees not


to raise the Eleventh Amendment to the United States Constitution or


comparable defense to the validity of such waiver.


Nothing herein shall be construed to authorize a money judgment


other than for damages for failure to comply with an arbitration


decision requiring the payment of monies.


Part 13. CONSTRUCTION OF COMPACT; FEDERAL APPROVAL


A. Each provision, section, and subsection of this Compact


shall stand separate and independent of every other provision,


section, or subsection. In the event that a federal district court


shall find any provision, section, or subsection of this Compact to


be invalid, the remaining provisions, sections, and subsections of


this Compact shall remain in full force and effect, unless the


invalidated provision, section or subsection is material.


B. Each party hereto agrees to defend the validity of this


Compact and the legislation in which it is embodied. This Compact


shall constitute a binding agreement between the parties and shall


survive any repeal or amendment of the State-Tribal Gaming Act.


C. The parties shall cooperate in seeking approval of this


Compact from an appropriate federal agency as a tribal-state compact


under the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act.

Req. No. 2320 Page 63


D. The standards for electronic bonanza-style bingo games,


electronic instant bingo games and electronic amusement games


established in the State-Tribal Gaming Act as enacted in 2004, and,


at the election of the tribe, any standards contained in the


Oklahoma Horse Racing Commission rules issued pursuant to subsection


B of Section 268 of this title are hereby incorporated in this


Compact and shall survive any repeal of the State-Tribal Gaming Act,


or any games authorized thereunder. In the event that any of said


standards are changed by amendment of the State-Tribal Gaming Act,


the tribe shall have the option to incorporate said changes into


this Compact by delivery of written notice of said changes to the


Governor and the SCA.


Part 14. NOTICES


All notices required under this Compact shall be given by


certified mail, return receipt requested, commercial overnight


courier service, or personal delivery, to the following persons:


Governor


Chair, State-Tribal Relations Committee


Attorney General


[Principal Chief, Governor or Chair]


[Name of Tribe]


[Address]


With copies to:


_______________________

Req. No. 2320 Page 64


_______________________


Part 15. DURATION AND NEGOTIATION


A. This Compact shall become effective upon the last date of


the satisfaction of the following requirements:


1. Due execution on behalf of the tribe, including obtaining


all tribal resolutions and completing other tribal procedures as may


be necessary to render the tribe’s execution effective;


2. Approval of this Compact by the Secretary of the Interior as


a tribal-state compact within the meaning of IGRA and publication in


the Federal Register or satisfaction of any other requirement of


federal law; and


3. Payment of the start-up assessment provided for in


subsection C of Part 11 of this Compact.


B. This Compact shall have a term which will expire on January


1, 2020, and at that time, if organization licensees or others are


authorized to conduct electronic gaming in any form other than pari-


mutuel wagering on live horse racing pursuant to any governmental


action of the state or court order following the effective date of


this Compact, the Compact shall automatically renew for successive


additional fifteen-year terms; provided that, within one hundred


eighty (180) days of the expiration of this Compact or any renewal


thereof, either the tribe or the state, acting through its Governor,


may request to renegotiate the terms of subsections A and E of Part


of this Compact.

Req. No. 2320 Page 65


C. This Compact shall remain in full force and effect until the


sooner of expiration of the term or until the Compact is terminated


by mutual consent of the parties.


D. This Compact may be terminated by state upon thirty (30)


days’ prior written notice to the tribe in the event of either (1) a


material breach by the tribe of the terms of a tobacco Compact with


the state as evidenced by a final determination of material breach


from the dispute resolution forum agreed upon therein, including


exhaustion of all available appellate remedies therefrom, or (2) the


tribe’s failure to comply with the provisions of Section 346 et seq.


of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, provided that the tribe may


cure either default within the thirty-day notice period, or within


such additional period as may be reasonably required to cure the


default, in order to preserve continuation of this Compact.


The state hereby agrees that this subsection is severable from


this Compact and shall automatically be severed from this Compact in


the event that the United States Department of the Interior


determines that these provisions exceed the state’s authority under


IGRA.


Part 16. AUTHORITY TO EXECUTE


This Compact, as an enactment of the people of Oklahoma, is


deemed approved by the State of Oklahoma. No further action by the


state or any state official is necessary for this Compact to take


effect upon approval by the Secretary of the Interior and

Req. No. 2320 Page 66


publication in the Federal Register. The undersigned tribal


official(s) represents that he or she is duly authorized and has the


authority to execute this Compact on behalf of the tribe for whom he


or she is signing.


APPROVED:


[Name of Tribe]


____________________________ Date _________________


[CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER]


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2320 CAD 1/15/2026 9:10:31 AM



























Req. No. 2320 Page 67